Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1478
Deceptive or misleading advertising; violation; penalty.

Any person, firm, corporation or association violating the provisions of section 28-1476 shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1980, LB 185, § 3.